Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3227
Districts; funds; investment.

Each district may invest any surplus money in the district treasury, including such money as may be in any sinking fund established for the purpose of providing for the payment of the principal or interest of any contract, bond, or other indebtedness or for any other purpose, not required for the immediate needs of the district as provided in sections 77-2341, 77-2365.01, and 77-2366. The functions and duties authorized by this section shall be performed under such rules and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 27, p. 117;

Laws 1972, LB 206, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 81, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 2.